Utah statutes.
34-23-207.   Permitted occupations with no specific age limitations or
restrictions.
With consent of the minor's parent, guardian, or custodian, no specific age
limitations or restrictions are imposed for:
(1)  home chores and other work done for parent or guardian;
(2)  any casual work not determined harmful by the division;
(3)  agricultural work including the operation of power-driven farm machinery
in the production of agricultural products; or
(4)  work for which a specific, written authorization has been made by the
division.
